Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-606
Acceleration or deceleration lane, defined.

Acceleration or deceleration lane shall mean a supplementary lane of a highway lane for traffic, which adjoins the traveled lanes of a highway and connects an approach or exit road with such highway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 102.